Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB216.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 246 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Employees of the department who are not employed within the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy
established in KRS 246.030 shall not be prohibited under Section 2 of this Act from participating in,
applying for, or receiving funds, awards, or contracts administered by the department through the Kentucky
Office of Agricultural Policy's Agricultural Development Board or Kentucky Agricultural Finance
Corporation.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (13) of Section 2 of this Act, employees of the department, including those
employed by the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy, shall be subject to the prohibitions in Section 2 of
this Act.
(3) This section shall be retroactive to March 12, 2021.
Section 2. KRS 11A.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A public servant, in order to further his or her own economic interests, or those of any other person, shall not
knowingly disclose or use confidential information acquired in the course of his or her official duties.
(2) A public servant shall not knowingly receive, directly or indirectly, any interest or profit arising from the use
or loan of public funds in his or her hands or to be raised through any state agency.
(3) A public servant shall not knowingly act as a representative or agent for the Commonwealth or any agency in
the transaction of any business or regulatory action with himself or herself, or with any business in which he or
she or a member of his or her family has any interest greater than five percent (5%) of the total value thereof.
(4) A public servant shall not knowingly himself or herself or through any business in which he or she owns or
controls an interest of more than five percent (5%), or by any other person for his or her use or benefit or on
his or her account, undertake, execute, hold, bid on, negotiate, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract,
agreement, lease, sale, or purchase made, entered into, awarded, or granted by the agency by which he or she
is employed or which he or she supervises, subject to the provisions of KRS 45A.340. This provision shall not
apply to:
(a) A contract, purchase, or good faith negotiation made pursuant to KRS Chapter 416 relating to eminent
domain; or
(b) Agreements which may directly or indirectly involve public funds disbursed through entitlement
programs; or
(c) A public servant's spouse or child doing business with any state agency other than the agency by which
the public servant is employed or which he or she supervises; or
(d) Purchases from a state agency that are available on the same terms to the general public or that are
made at public auction; or
(e) Sales of craft items to a state park by interim state employees designated as craftspersons under KRS
148.257.
(5) A public servant shall not knowingly accept compensation, other than that provided by law for public servants,
for performance of his or her official duties without the prior approval of the commission.
(6) A former officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall not, within one (1) year of
termination of his or her employment, knowingly by himself or herself or through any business in which he or
she owns or controls an interest of at least five percent (5%), or by any other person for his or her use or
benefit or on his or her account, undertake, execute, hold, bid on, negotiate, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any
contract, agreement, lease, sale, or purchase made, entered into, awarded, or granted by the agency by which
he or she was employed. This provision shall not apply to a contract, purchase, or good-faith negotiation made
under KRS Chapter 416 relating to eminent domain or to agreements that may directly or indirectly involve
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
public funds disbursed through entitlement programs. This provision shall not apply to purchases from a state
agency that are available on the same terms to the general public or that are made at public auction. This
provision shall not apply to former officers of the Department of Public Advocacy whose continued
representation of clients is necessary in order to prevent an adverse effect on the client.
(7) A present or former officer or public servant listed in KRS 11A.010(9)(a) to (g) shall not, within one (1) year
following termination of his or her office or employment, accept employment, compensation, or other
economic benefit from any person or business that contracts or does business with, or is regulated by, the state
in matters in which he or she was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure.
This provision shall not prohibit an individual from returning to the same business, firm, occupation, or
profession in which he or she was involved prior to taking office or beginning his or her term of employment,
or for which he or she received, prior to his or her state employment, a professional degree or license, provided
that, for a period of one (1) year, he or she personally refrains from working on any matter in which he or she
was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure in state government. This
subsection shall not prohibit the performance of ministerial functions, including but not limited to filing tax
returns, filing applications for permits or licenses, or filing incorporation papers, nor shall it prohibit the
former officer or public servant from receiving public funds disbursed through entitlement programs.
(8) A former public servant shall not act as a lobbyist or lobbyist's principal in matters in which he or she was
directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure for a period of one (1) year after the
latter of:
(a) The date of leaving office or termination of employment; or
(b) The date the term of office expires to which the public servant was elected.
(9) A former public servant shall not represent a person or business before a state agency in a matter in which the
former public servant was directly involved during the last thirty-six (36) months of his or her tenure, for a
period of one (1) year after the latter of:
(a) The date of leaving office or termination of employment; or
(b) The date the term of office expires to which the public servant was elected.
(10) Without the approval of his or her appointing authority, a public servant shall not accept outside employment
from any person or business that does business with or is regulated by the state agency for which the public
servant works or which he or she supervises, unless the outside employer's relationship with the state agency is
limited to the receipt of entitlement funds.
(a) The appointing authority shall review administrative regulations established under KRS Chapter 11A
when deciding whether to approve outside employment for a public servant.
(b) The appointing authority shall not approve outside employment for a public servant if the public servant
is involved in decision-making or recommendations concerning the person or business from which the
public servant seeks outside employment or compensation.
(c) The appointing authority, if applicable, shall file quarterly with the Executive Branch Ethics
Commission a list of all employees who have been approved for outside employment along with the
name of the outside employer of each.
(11) The prohibitions imposed by subsection (5) or (10) of this section shall not apply to Professional Golfers'
Association class A members who teach golf lessons and receive a fee or lesson charge at golf courses owned
and operated by the Kentucky Department of Parks. Instruction provided by an employee of the
Commonwealth shall only be given while the employee is on his or her own personal time. The commissioner
of the Department of Parks shall promulgate administrative regulations to establish guidelines for the process
by which Professional Golfers' Association class A members are approved to teach golf lessons at Kentucky
Department of Parks-owned golf courses. The exception granted by this subsection is in recognition of the
benefits that will accrue to the Kentucky Department of Parks due to increased participation at state-owned
golf courses.
(12) The prohibitions imposed by subsections (6) to (10) of this section shall not apply to members of the Kentucky
Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation.
(13) (a) This section shall not be construed to prohibit employees of the Department of Agriculture who are
not employed within the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy established in KRS 246.030 from

CHAPTER 102 3
participating in, applying for, or receiving funds, awards, or contracts administered by the
Department of Agriculture through the Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy.
(b) This subsection shall be retroactive to March 12, 2021.
Section 3. Whereas agriculture impacts the well-being of every citizen throughout the Commonwealth and
access to resources offered by various state agencies is vital to the advancement of the agricultural industry, an
emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its
otherwise becoming a law.
Veto Overridden March 27, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version